Louisiana, session 2026, HB687.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:81(C) and (D) and 281(C), (D), and (F) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 26:81.2 and 281.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§81. Location of business limited
* * *
C.(1) When prohibited by municipal or parish ordinance, no permit shall be
granted for any premises situated within three hundred feet or less, as fixed by the
ordinance, of a public playground or of a building used exclusively as a church or
synagogue, public library, school, full-time day care center as defined in R.S.
17:405(A)(4), or a correctional facility housing inmates, including but not limited to
a halfway house, or a residence located within a historic neighborhood. In
municipalities and in unincorporated areas which are divided into subdivisions with
streets, blocks, and sidewalks, subject to the adoption of the alternate method of
measurement as provided for in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, this distance shall
be measured as a person walks using the sidewalk from the nearest point of the
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1189 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 687
property line of the church, synagogue, public library, public playground, school,
full-time day care center, or correctional facility housing inmates, including but not
limited to a halfway house, or a residence located within a historic neighborhood to
the nearest point of the premises to be licensed.
(2) A municipality may adopt an ordinance establishing an alternate method
of measurement of the three hundred foot limitation by measuring in a straight line
from the nearest point of the property line of the church or synagogue, public library,
school, or full-time day care center to the nearest point of the premises to be
licensed, or a residence located within a historic neighborhood. Such alternate
method of measurement shall only apply prospectively to the issuance of a new
alcohol permit issued on or after the date the ordinance has been adopted.
D. Outside of municipalities and unincorporated areas which are not divided
into subdivisions with streets, blocks, or sidewalks, parish ordinances may extend the
prohibition to a distance of five hundred feet of the church, synagogue, public
library, school, full-time day care center, playground, or a correctional facility
housing inmates, including but not limited to a halfway house, or a residence located
within a historic neighborhood. The measurement of this distance shall be made in
the same manner as the measurement is made in municipalities.
* * *
§81.2. Revocation of permits; location of a purchased premises
When a permit has been granted for any premises described in R.S. 26:81 that
is situated within three hundred feet or less of a public playground or of a building
used exclusively as a church or synagogue, public library, school, full-time day care
center as defined in R.S. 17:405(A)(4), a correctional facility housing inmates,
including but not limited to a halfway house, or a residence located within a historic
neighborhood and the premises is sold, the permit shall be revoked as of the date of
the sale of the premises. Nothing shall prevent the reapplication for the issuance of
a permit as provided for in this Chapter.
* * *
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1189 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 687
§281. Location of business limited; exception
* * *
C.(1)(a) When prohibited by municipal or parish ordinance, no permit shall
be granted for any premises situated within three hundred feet or less, as fixed by the
ordinance, of a public playground, of a building used exclusively as a church or
synagogue, public library, school, or full-time day care center as defined in R.S.
17:405(A)(4), or correctional facility housing inmates, including but not limited to
a halfway house, or a residence located within a historic neighborhood. In
municipalities and in unincorporated areas which are divided into subdivisions with
streets, blocks, sidewalks, etc., subject to the adoption of the alternate method of
measurement as provided for in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, this distance shall
be measured as a person walks using the sidewalk from the nearest point of the
property line of the church or synagogue, public library, public playground, school,
full-time day care center, or a correctional facility housing inmates, including but not
limited to a halfway house to the nearest point of the premises to be licensed.
(b) A municipality may adopt an ordinance establishing an alternate method
of measurement of the three hundred foot limitation by measuring in a straight line
from the nearest point of the property line of the church or synagogue, public library,
school, or full-time day care center to the nearest point of the premises to be
licensed, or a residence located within a historic neighborhood. Such alternate
method of measurement shall only apply prospectively to the issuance of a new
alcohol permit issued on or after the date the ordinance has been adopted.
(2) The commissioner shall not deny any applicant located outside a
municipality a permit based on the distance requirements of this Subsection, if the
parish governing authority and the organization that operates the public playground
or owns the building used exclusively as a church or synagogue, public library,
school, full-time day care center, or the correctional facility housing inmates,
including but not limited to a halfway house, or a residence located within a historic
neighborhood waive opposition to the applicant's permit. The provisions of this
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1189 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 687
Paragraph shall does not apply in the parishes of Pointe Coupee, West Baton Rouge,
East Feliciana, West Feliciana, and St. Bernard.
D. Police juries may enact ordinances extending the distances between
licensed premises and the property line of churches, synagogues, public libraries,
public playgrounds, schools, full-time day care centers, and correctional facilities
housing inmates, including but not limited to halfway houses to five hundred feet,
and a residence located within a historic neighborhood.
* * *
F. Should any premises licensed to deal in beverages of low alcoholic
content be located within a distance less than that provided by a municipal or parish
ordinance pursuant to this Section from property which is purchased or acquired after
the license was obtained for the construction, erection, movement, or development
of a public playground or a building used exclusively as a church or synagogue,
public library, school, full-time day care center, or correctional facility housing
inmates, including but not limited to a halfway house, or a residence located within
a historic neighborhood, such subsequent purchase or acquisition shall not be
grounds for the revocation, withholding, denial, or refusal to renew the permit on
said premises either by state or local authorities.
* * *
§281.2. Revocation of permits; location of a purchased premises
When a permit has been granted for any premises pursuant to R.S. 26:281
that is situated within three hundred feet or less of a public playground or of a
building used exclusively as a church or synagogue, public library, school, full-time
day care center as defined in R.S. 17:405(A)(4), a correctional facility housing
inmates, including but not limited to a halfway house, or a residence located within
a historic neighborhood and the premises is sold, the permit shall be revoked as of
the date of the sale of the premises. Nothing shall prevent the reapplication for the
issuance of a permit as provided for in this Chapter.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1189 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 687